Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 117
TRANSITION PROVISIONS

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

Section

7-117-101. Application to existing corporations.

For purposes of this article, "existing corporation" means any domestic corporation that was in existence on June 30, 1994, and that was incorporated under any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of corporations for profit if the power to amend or repeal the statute under which the corporation was incorporated was reserved.

Articles 101 to 117 of this title apply to all existing corporations.

Except to the extent the articles of incorporation of an existing corporation limit or deny preemptive rights, shareholders of such corporation shall have a preemptive right to acquire unissued shares or securities convertible into such shares or carrying a right to subscribe to or acquire shares; except that, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, such preemptive rights shall not exist:

To acquire any shares issued to directors, officers, or employees pursuant to approval by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote thereon or when authorized by and not inconsistent with a plan theretofore approved by such a vote of shareholders; or

To acquire any shares sold otherwise than for cash.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, unless the articles of incorporation of an existing corporation provide otherwise:

Holders of shares of any class that is preferred or limited as to dividends or assets shall not be entitled to any preemptive right;

Holders of shares of common stock shall not be entitled to any preemptive right to shares of any class that is preferred or limited as to dividends or assets or to any obligations unless such shares are convertible into shares of common stock or carry a right to subscribe to or acquire shares of common stock; and

Holders of common stock without voting powers shall have no preemptive right to shares of common stock with voting power.

To the extent that preemptive rights exist pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the preemptive right shall be only an opportunity to acquire shares or other securities under such terms and conditions as the board of directors may fix for the purpose of providing a fair and reasonable opportunity for the exercise of such right.

Nothing in subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall confer any preemptive right with respect to shares of a corporation incorporated before January 1, 1959, that have been or may be issued and subsequently acquired by such corporation and that have not been canceled or restored to the status of authorized but unissued shares. Any such shares in existence on June 30, 1994, or acquired thereafter by any such corporation shall not be deemed to be restored to the status of authorized but unissued shares, for purposes of this subsection (6) only, notwithstanding the provisions of section 7-106-302.

Unless the articles of incorporation of an existing corporation contain a provision establishing the vote of shareholders required to amend the articles of incorporation, as contemplated in section 7-110-103, such amendment shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the amendment by two-thirds of all the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment by that voting group.

Unless the articles of incorporation of an existing corporation contain a provision establishing the vote of shareholders required to approve a plan of merger or a plan of exchange, as contemplated in section 7-111-103, the plan must be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by two-thirds of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group. In the case of a corporation incorporated before July 1, 1978, each outstanding share of the corporation, other than a redeemable share that is not entitled to vote by reason of section 7-107-202 (4), shall be entitled to vote on the plan of merger or exchange whether or not such share has voting rights under the provisions of the articles of incorporation, unless the articles of incorporation have been amended after June 30, 1978, by the same vote of shareholders that would have been necessary at the time of the amendment to approve the plan, so as to restrict or eliminate the right of the share to vote on the plan.

Unless the articles of incorporation of an existing corporation contain a provision establishing the vote of shareholders required to approve a transaction involving a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of its property, with or without its good will, otherwise than in the usual and regular course of business, as contemplated in section 7-112-102 (1), such transaction shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the transaction by two-thirds of all the votes entitled to be cast on the transaction by that voting group.

Unless the articles of incorporation of an existing corporation contain a provision establishing the vote of shareholders required to approve a proposal to dissolve the corporation as contemplated in section 7-114-102, such proposal shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the proposal by two-thirds of all the votes entitled to be cast on the proposal by that voting group. In the case of a corporation incorporated before July 1, 1978, each outstanding share of the corporation, other than a redeemable share that is not entitled to vote by reason of section 7-107-202 (4), shall be entitled to vote on a proposal to dissolve the corporation whether or not such share has voting rights under the provisions of the articles of incorporation, unless the articles of incorporation have been amended after June 30, 1978, by the same vote of shareholders which would have been necessary at the time of the amendment to approve the proposal, so as to restrict or eliminate the right of such share to vote on such proposal.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation of an existing corporation to reduce the vote required to take any action specified in subsections (7) to (10) of this section, which amendment may not reduce the required vote to less than that which would be required to take the action if the action were to be taken by a corporation formed on or after July 1, 1994, shall be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take the action specified in said subsections (7) to (10).

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 850, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(11) amended, p. 1328, § 51, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(10) amended, p. 1509, § 289, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(8) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1965, § 67, effective July 1, 2020.

7-117-102. Application to foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state on June 30, 1994, is subject to articles 101 to 117 of this title but is not required to obtain new authorization to transact business or conduct activities under said articles.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 852, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2332, § 278, effective July 1, 2004.

7-117-103. Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the repeal of any provision of the "Colorado Corporation Code", articles 1 to 10 of this title, does not affect:

The operation of the statute, or any action taken under it, before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under the provision before its repeal;

Any violation of the provision, or any penalty, forfeiture, or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or

Any proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution commenced under the provision before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization, or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the provision as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of any provision of the "Colorado Corporation Code", articles 1 to 10 of this title, is reduced by articles 101 to 117 of this title, the penalty or punishment, if not already imposed, shall be imposed in accordance with said articles 101 to 117.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 853, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-117-104. Severability.

If any provision of articles 101 to 117 of this title or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of said articles that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of said articles are severable.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 853, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-117-105. Effective date.

Articles 101 to 117 of this title are effective July 1, 1994.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 853, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.